Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-535
Directors; bond required.

Each director shall furnish a corporate surety bond at the expense of the district in the sum of ten thousand dollars to be approved by the Secretary of State and filed in his office, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as such director.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 9(6), p. 533.